Hawaii statutes.
[§431:4-234] Proxies, consents, and
authorizations. No domestic stock insurer, or any director, officer, or
employee of the insurer, or any other person, shall solicit, or permit the use
of the person's name to solicit, by mail or otherwise, any proxy, consent, or
authorization with respect to any stock of the insurer in contravention of this
part or schedule A in section 431:4-232 and schedule B in [section] 431:4-233.
[L 2000, c 24, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next